Utah statutes.
4-10-8.   Use of rubber stamp or stencil authorized -- Conditions for use.
A rubber stamp or stencil may be used instead of a tag on articles with slip
covers if the article has a smooth backing, or on suitable surfaces of
containers or bales of filling material; provided, the information required by
Section 4-10-7 is indelible and legible.
